Washington statutes.
RCW 43.388.030

Use of state flag.

The Washington state leadership board may use the image of the Washington state flag to promote the mission of the organization as set forth under *RCW 43.15.030. The board retains any revenue generated by the use of the image, when the usage is consistent with the purposes under *RCW 43.15.030.

[ 2020 c 114 s 19; 2005 c 69 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.15.040, 43.342.020.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.15.030 was recodified as RCW 43.388.010 pursuant to 2022 c 96 s 8.

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.